Tennessee, session 114, SB0903.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 39, Chapter 17, Part 13, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
39-17-1330.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Family member" means a spouse, parent, grandparent, sibling, child,
or grandchild, whether the relationship is by blood, marriage, or adoption; and
(2) "Gun dealer" means a person engaged in the business, as defined in
18 U.S.C. § 921, of selling, leasing, or otherwise transferring a firearm, whether
the person is a retail dealer, pawnbroker, or otherwise.
(b) A person shall not sell or transfer ownership of a firearm, or purchase or
obtain ownership of a firearm, unless one (1) of the following applies:
(1) The seller or transferor is a gun dealer;
(2) The seller or transferor makes the sale or transfer to or through a gun
dealer and obtains a receipt;
(3) The sale or transfer of ownership of the firearm is one (1) of the
following:
(A) A firearm classified as an antique firearm under 18 U.S.C. §
921;
SB0903
001148
- 1 -

(B) A transfer of a firearm between gun dealers or between
wholesalers and dealers; or
(C) A transfer of any firearm to a law enforcement or military
agency;
(4) The transferor is transferring ownership of the firearm to a family
member by gift, bequest, or inheritance; the transferee is not prohibited from
possessing a firearm under this part; and the transferee is at least eighteen (18)
years of age; or
(5) The transferor is transferring ownership of the firearm with the intent
that the transfer be temporary, neither the transferor nor the transferee is
prohibited from possessing a firearm under this part, and the purpose of the
transfer is not prohibited by law.
(c) A person who intentionally violates subsection (b) commits a Class B
misdemeanor and shall be fined not less than five hundred dollars ($500) nor more than
ten thousand dollars ($10,000) and may be imprisoned for a period not to exceed nine
(9) months. A person convicted under this section is prohibited from possessing a
firearm for a period of two (2) years.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 001148